src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_IEDNAK_s2 
+Sg+Nom:g2%> # ; 
:g2%> N_ODD_X ; 
+Comp:^WG A_ODD_COMP ; ! normally ienabu (but Rensund: ienaba)
+Comp+Use/NG:^WG A_ODD_COMP_a ;
+Superl:^WG A_ODD_SUP ;
+Superl+Use/NG:^WG A_ODD_jSUP ;


LEXICON A_NAGAN ! nagan/nagan/nagana etc. (no COMP/SUPERL)
+A+Attr:%> # ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%> # ;
+A: N_ODD_X ; 


LEXICON A_GIENES ! gienes/gienes/gädnása/?/?
+A+Attr:s^WG%> # ;
+A: A_GIENES_s2 ; 

LEXICON A_GIENES_s2 
+Sg+Nom:s^WG%> # ; 
+Pl+Nom:s^V2E2AA N_ODD_X ; 
!+Comp:^V2E2AA A_EVEN_COMP ;
!+Superl:^V2E2AA A_EVEN_SUP ;


LEXICON A_GÅJKES ! gåjjke/gåjkes/gåjjkása/gåjjkáp/gåjjkájmus-
+A+Attr:%> # ;
+A: A_GÅJKES_s2 ; 

LEXICON A_GÅJKES_s2 
+Sg+Nom:^WG%>s # ; 
+Pl+Nom:%>^V2E2AAsa K ; 
+Comp: A_ODD_COMP_V2E2AA ;
+Superl: A_ODD_jSUP_V2E2AA ;

LEXICON A_KUORA ! kuora 'left over, kvar' NO ATTR FORM!
+A: A_KUORA_s2 ; 

LEXICON A_KUORA_s2 
+Sg+Nom:%> K ; 
+Pl+Nom:%> K ; 
+Comp:^WG A_ODD_COMP_V2E2AA ;
+Superl:^WG A_ODD_jSUP_V2E2AA ;

LEXICON A_VAASSE ! vásse, färrta, jåhteje (only ATTR, no PRED-forms!)
+A+Attr:%> # ;
!not sure about Comp/Superl !árra -> árajmus


LEXICON A_UMASSE ! umas/umasºse/umasse 'all kinds of' 
+A+Attr:%> # ;
+A:ºs A_UMASSE_s2 ; 

LEXICON A_UMASSE_s2 
+Sg+Nom:%>e K ; 
+Pl+Nom:^WG%>e K ; 
+Sg+Acc:^WG%>ev # ; 
!+Pl+Acc:^WG%>ijd # ; not sure about this, plus VH won't work b/c 3 syllables!
!+Comp: A_ODD_COMP_V2E2AA ;
!+Superl: A_ODD_jSUP_V2E2AA ;

LEXICON A_JUHKE !juges/juhke/juhke ??
+A+Attr:^WG%>s # ;
+A: A_JUHKE_s2 ; 

LEXICON A_JUHKE_s2 
+Sg+Nom:%> K ; 
+Pl+Nom:%> K ; 
!+Comp: A_ODD_COMP_V2E2AA ;
!+Superl: A_ODD_jSUP_V2E2AA ;


LEXICON A_SJAEVDNJET ! sjevdnjis/sjävdnjet/sjävdnjeda/sjävdnjedup/sjävdnjemus- !unexpected forms, but evidence from wordlist
+A+Attr:^IJ%>s # ;
+A: A_SJAEVDNJET_s2 ; 

LEXICON A_SJAEVDNJET_s2 
+Sg+Nom:d2%> # ; 
+Pl+Nom:d2%>a # ; 
+Comp:^WG A_ODD_COMP ;
+Superl:^WG A_ODD_SUP ;




! COMP/SUPERL rules:
!COMP:
!if even-syllabled COMP-ATTR wordform and V2 ≠ e, then V2-p in ATTR, SG.NOM, -V2-ba in PL.NOM
LEXICON A_ODD_COMP
:%>b2 A_ODD_COMP_s2 ;

!if even-syllabled COMP-ATTR wordform and V2 = a, then V2-p in ATTR, SG.NOM, -V2-bu in PL.NOM
LEXICON A_ODD_COMP_a
:%>b2 A_ODD_COMP_a_s2 ;

!if even-syllabled wordform COMP-ATTR and V2 = e, then -á-p in ATTR, SG.NOM, -á-ba in PL.NOM
LEXICON A_ODD_COMP_V2E2AA 
:%>^V2E2AAb2 A_EVEN_COMP_s2 ;

LEXICON A_ODD_COMP_s2 
+Attr: # ;
+Sg+Nom: # ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>a # ;
:%> N_ODD_X ;

LEXICON A_ODD_COMP_a_s2 
+Attr: # ;
+Sg+Nom: # ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>u # ;
:%> N_ODD_X_adjCompU ;

!if odd-syllabled wordform COMP-ATTR, then -up in ATTR, SG.NOM, -uba/-ubo in PL.NOM (seemingly random for PL.NOM)
LEXICON A_EVEN_COMP 
:u%>b2 A_EVEN_COMP_s2 ;

LEXICON A_EVEN_COMP_s2 
+Attr: # ;
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Pl+Nom:%> N_ODD_X ;
+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%> N_ODD_X_adjCompU ;


!SUPERL:
!if even-syllabled SUPERL-ATTR wordform and V2 = e,å,o sometimes a, then -mus
LEXICON A_ODD_SUP
:%>mus A_ODD_SUP_s2 ;

!if even-syllabled SUPERL-ATTR wordform and V2 = á,i, sometimes a, then -jmus
LEXICON A_ODD_jSUP 
:%>jmus A_ODD_SUP_s2 ;

!if even-syllabled SUPERL-ATTR wordform and V2 = e, then -ájmus
LEXICON A_ODD_jSUP_V2E2AA 
:%>^V2E2AAjmus A_ODD_SUP_s2 ;

LEXICON A_ODD_SUP_s2  
+Attr: # ;
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Ela:%>t # ; !ienamust (sje19210000a-lagercrantz1957a-427.016)
+Pl+Nom:%>u # ;


!if odd-syllabled SUPERL-ATTR wordform, then -umos in ATTR, SG.NOM, -ubmusa in PL.NOM
LEXICON A_EVEN_SUP 
:%>ubmos A_EVEN_SUP_s2 ;

LEXICON A_EVEN_SUP_s2 
+Attr:^WG^V2O2U # ;
+Sg+Nom:^WG^V2O2U # ;
+Pl+Nom:^V2O2U%>a # ;



!highly unpredictable, suppletive, irregular lemmata
LEXICON A_VIERRE !vieráp, vierájmus (N-Germn loan, including lack of positive form)
+A+Comp:^WG A_ODD_COMP_V2E2AA ;
+A+Superl:^WG A_ODD_jSUP_V2E2AA ;
