src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
gienes:giedne A_GIENES "painful, evil, nasty" ; ! no. 2656
gieres:gierre A_GIENES "in love, loved" ; ! no. 90194
hálmes:hálbme A_GIENES "sweet" ; ! no. 91461
hieves:hievve A_GIENES "proud, impressive" ; ! no. 840
sieldes:siellde A_GIENES "terrible, huge, enormous" ; ! no. 90996
såmes:såbme A_GIENES "some" ; ! no. 1822
vijdes:vijjde A_GIENES "wide, stretched out far" ; ! no. 5771
vijses:vijjse A_GIENES "smart, wise" ; ! no. 5224
åhpes:åhppe A_GIENES "known" ; ! no. 2244
gåjkes:gåjjke A_GÅJKES "dry" ; ! no. 6239
juhke:juhke A_JUHKE "alcoholic, drunkard" ; ! no. 932
kuora:ku^Ora A_KUORA "left over, remaining" ; ! no. 986
lahka:lahka A_KUORA "near, close" ; ! no. 91110
nágge:nágge A_KUORA "tight, close (e.g. in a hut)" ; ! no. 4999
slijtane:slijtane A_KUORA "worn" ; ! no. 91105
nágan+Use/NG:nag A_NAGAN "some (-thing, -one)" ; ! no. 91170
nágan+Use/NG:nagan A_NAGAN "some (-thing, -one)" ; ! no. 90963
nágan:nágan A_NAGAN "some (-thing, -one)" ; ! no. 3430
nágan+Use/NG:nagi2n A_NAGAN "some (-thing, -one)" ; ! no. 90807
sjävdnjet:sjievdnje A_SJAEVDNJET "dark" ; ! no. 3301
umasse:umas A_UMASSE "all kinds of" ; ! no. 1343
árra:árra A_VAASSE "early" ; ! no. 91417
färrta:fä2rrta A_VAASSE "every, each and every" ; ! no. 4190
juohke:ju^Ohke A_VAASSE "every" ; ! no. 91616
jåhteje:jåhteje A_VAASSE "mover, a person migrating" ; ! no. 91295
lihkas:lihkas A_VAASSE "lame, with a limp" ; ! no. 5477
lihkas+Use/NG:liŋkas A_VAASSE "lame, with a limp" ; ! no. 91020
norska:norska A_VAASSE "Norwegian" ; ! no. 91002
sämmi+Use/NG:samºma A_VAASSE "same, identical" ; ! no. 91152
sierra:sierra A_VAASSE "special, different, separate" ; ! no. 91118
sisŋeldis:sisŋeldis A_VAASSE "internal, sincere" ; ! no. 91623
surgos:surgos A_VAASSE "sorrowful, sad" ; ! no. 91050
sämmi:sä2mºmi A_VAASSE "same, identical" ; ! no. 1841
unna+Use/NG:unnes A_VAASSE "small, little" ; ! no. 90859
vásse:vásºse A_VAASSE "previous" ; ! no. 90395
vierre:vierre A_VIERRE "(bad -> worse/worst)" ; ! no. 91154
